Illinois, session 104th, HB4779.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Nurse Practice Act is amended by adding 5Section 65-46 as follows: 6    (225 ILCS 65/65-46 new)7    Sec. 65-46. Use of radiation. Notwithstanding any 8provision of this Act or the implementation of any rule of the 9Department to the contrary, and pursuant to Section 5 of the 10Radiation Protection Act of 1990, an advanced practice 11registered nurse licensed under this Act may administer 12radiation to a human being and may supervise the 13administration of radiation by a person accredited to 14administer radiation to a human being by the Illinois 15Emergency Management Agency and Office of Homeland Security. 16    Section 10. The Radiation Protection Act of 1990 is 17amended by changing Sections 5 and 6 as follows: 18    (420 ILCS 40/5)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 210-5)19    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2027)20    Sec. 5. Limitations on application of radiation to human 21beings and requirements for radiation installation operators   HB4779- 2 -LRB104 19285 AAS 32731 b1providing mammography services.2    (a) No person shall intentionally administer radiation to 3a human being unless such person is licensed to practice 4treatment of human ailments by virtue of the Illinois Medical 5Practice Act of 1987, Illinois Dental Practice Act, or 6Podiatric Medical Practice Act of 1987, is an advanced 7practice registered nurse licensed under the Nurse Practice 8Act Acts, or, as physician assistant, advanced practice 9registered nurse, technologist, nurse, or other assistant, is 10acting under the supervision, prescription, or direction of 11such licensed person. However, no such physician assistant, 12advanced practice registered nurse, technologist, nurse, or 13other assistant acting under the supervision of a person 14licensed under the Medical Practice Act of 1987 or an advanced 15practice registered nurse licensed under the Nurse Practice 16Act , shall administer radiation to human beings unless 17accredited by the Agency, except that persons enrolled in a 18course of education approved by the Agency may apply ionizing 19radiation to human beings as required by their course of study 20when under the direct supervision of a person licensed under 21the Medical Practice Act of 1987. No person authorized by this 22Section to apply ionizing radiation shall apply such radiation 23except to those parts of the human body specified in the Act 24under which such person or his supervisor is licensed. No 25person may operate a radiation installation where ionizing 26radiation is administered to human beings unless all persons   HB4779- 3 -LRB104 19285 AAS 32731 b1who administer ionizing radiation in that radiation 2installation are licensed, accredited, or exempted in 3accordance with this Section. Nothing in this Section shall be 4deemed to relieve a person from complying with the provisions 5of Section 10.6    (b) In addition, no person shall provide mammography 7services unless all of the following requirements are met:8        (1) the mammography procedures are performed using a 9    radiation machine that is specifically designed for 10    mammography;11        (2) the mammography procedures are performed using a 12    radiation machine that is used solely for performing 13    mammography procedures;14        (3) the mammography procedures are performed using 15    equipment that has been subjected to a quality assurance 16    program that satisfies quality assurance requirements 17    which the Agency shall establish by rule;18        (4) beginning one year after the effective date of 19    this amendatory Act of 1991, if the mammography procedure 20    is performed by a radiologic technologist, that 21    technologist, in addition to being accredited by the 22    Agency to perform radiography, has satisfied training 23    requirements specific to mammography, which the Agency 24    shall establish by rule.25    (c) Every operator of a radiation installation at which 26mammography services are provided shall ensure and have   HB4779- 4 -LRB104 19285 AAS 32731 b1confirmed by each patient that the patient is provided with a 2printed or digital pamphlet that has been prepared in 3accordance with Section 2310-345 of the Department of Public 4Health Powers and Duties Law of the Civil Administrative Code 5of Illinois, which is orally reviewed with the patient.6(Source: P.A. 103-1012, eff. 8-9-24.) 7    (420 ILCS 40/6)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 210-6)8    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2027)9    Sec. 6. Accreditation of administrators of radiation; 10limited scope accreditation; rules and regulations; education.11    (a) The Agency shall promulgate such rules and regulations 12as are necessary to establish accreditation standards and 13procedures, including a minimum course of education and 14continuing education requirements in the administration of 15radiation to human beings, which are appropriate to the 16classification of accreditation and which are to be met by all 17physician assistants, advanced practice registered nurses, 18nurses, technicians, or other assistants who administer 19radiation to human beings under the supervision of a person 20licensed under the Medical Practice Act of 1987 or an advanced 21practice registered nurse licensed under the Nurse Practice 22Act. Such rules and regulations may provide for different 23classes of accreditation based on evidence of national 24certification, clinical experience or community hardship as 25conditions of initial and continuing accreditation. The rules   HB4779- 5 -LRB104 19285 AAS 32731 b1and regulations of the Agency shall be consistent with 2national standards in regard to the protection of the health 3and safety of the general public.4    (b) The rules and regulations shall also provide that 5persons who have been accredited by the Agency, in accordance 6with the Radiation Protection Act of 1990, without passing an 7examination, will remain accredited as provided in Section 43 8of this Act and that those persons may be accredited, without 9passing an examination, to use other equipment, procedures, or 10supervision within the original category of accreditation if 11the Agency receives written assurances from a person licensed 12under the Medical Practice Act of 1987, that the person 13accredited has the necessary skill and qualifications for such 14additional equipment procedures or supervision. The Agency 15shall, in accordance with subsection (c) of this Section, 16provide for the accreditation of nurses, technicians, or other 17assistants, unless exempted elsewhere in this Act, to perform 18a limited scope of diagnostic radiography procedures of the 19chest, the extremities, skull and sinuses, or the spine, while 20under the supervision of a person licensed under the Medical 21Practice Act of 1987 or an advanced practice registered nurse 22licensed under the Nurse Practice Act.23    (c) The rules or regulations promulgated by the Agency 24pursuant to subsection (a) shall establish standards and 25procedures for accrediting persons to perform a limited scope 26of diagnostic radiography procedures. The rules or regulations   HB4779- 6 -LRB104 19285 AAS 32731 b1shall specify that an individual seeking accreditation for 2limited diagnostic radiography shall not apply ionizing 3radiation to human beings until the individual has passed an 4Agency-approved examination and is accredited by the Agency.5    For an individual to be accredited to perform a limited 6scope of diagnostic radiography procedures, he or she must 7pass an examination approved by the Agency. The examination 8shall be consistent with national standards in regard to 9protection of public health and safety. The examination shall 10consist of a standardized component covering general 11principles applicable to diagnostic radiography procedures and 12a clinical component specific to the types of procedures for 13which accreditation is being sought. The Agency may assess a 14reasonable fee for such examinations to cover any costs 15incurred by the Agency in conjunction with the examinations.16    (d) The Agency shall by rule or regulation exempt from 17accreditation physician assistants, advanced practice 18registered nurses, nurses, technicians, or other assistants 19who administer radiation to human beings under supervision of 20a person licensed to practice under the Medical Practice Act 21of 1987 or an advanced practice registered nurse licensed 22under the Nurse Practice Act when the services are performed 23on employees of a business at a medical facility owned and 24operated by the business. Such exemption shall only apply to 25the equipment, procedures, and supervision specific to the 26medical facility owned and operated by the business.  HB4779- 7 -LRB104 19285 AAS 32731 b1(Source: P.A. 103-155, eff. 1-1-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24.)